Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-544
Spear fishing; commission; powers.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to open specified waters to underwater, powered spear fishing and limit or control such powered spear fishing.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 264.